District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0112.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Department of Parks and Recreation Field Priority Access Amendment
Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 6a of An Act To vest in the Commissioners of the District of Columbia
control of street parking in said District, effective July 1, 1898 (30 Stat. 570; D.C. Official Code §
10–137.01) is amended by adding a new subsection (d-1) to read as follows:
“(d-1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Director of the Department shall
establish a program in partnership with the District of Columbia Public Schools (“DCPS”) to allow


for the use of DCPS outdoor athletic and recreational fields in every ward on evenings and
weekends, outside of the hours in which the fields are in active use by schools or the Department.”.
Sec. 3. The Division of Park Services Act of 1988, effective March 16, 1988 (D.C. Law 7-
209; D.C. Official Code § 10-166 et seq.) is amended by adding a new section 2b to read as follows:
“Sec. 2b. Certified community-based youth sports organizations.
“(a) The Department of Parks and Recreation (“Department”) shall establish a Certified
Community-Based Youth Sports Organization program for the issuance of outdoor field permits,
which shall be determined and certified by the Department.
“(b) A certified community-based youth sports organization seeking a permit under this
program shall:
“(1) Be a District-registered non-profit organization that is tax exempt under 26
U.S.C. § 501(c)(3), (4), or (6);
“(2) Serve at least 100% of youth under the age of 19, 75% of which are District
residents;
“(3) Not restrict participation based on ability;
“(4) Have a documented process to waive organization fees and uniform costs for
low-income families;
“(5) Have at least 75% of its leadership team, board of directors, or similar
governing body maintain a primary residence within the District; and
“(6) Have and maintain accident and general liability insurance.
“(c) Certified community-based youth sports organizations shall receive the same priority
when rescheduling following a weather-related cancellation as they would be allowed during the
initial permit application.


“(d) The Department shall make available to certified community-based youth sports
organizations any necessary lighting and be responsible for the operation of field lighting as
necessary at District parks and recreational fields and DCPS athletic and recreational fields during
the following windows each week during a season at the same rate for non-profit entities:
“(1) For District parks and recreational fields, Monday through Friday from 4:00
p.m. to 9:00 p.m., or for a DCPS school during afterschool programs Monday through Friday from
6:00 p.m. to 9:00 p.m.; and
“(2) Saturday and Sunday from 8:00 a.m. to 7:00 p.m.
“(e)(1) DCPS may provide access to bathroom or locker room facilities or security services.
“(2) Certified community-based youth sports organizations shall:
“(A) Be responsible for the cleanup and disposal of all trash or debris related
to their activities; and
“(B) Leave the athletic and recreational field secured as requested by the
Department or DCPS.
“(3) DCPS shall not pass on associated costs for staffing, custodial, or security
services to certified community-based youth sports organizations.
“(f) DCPS may cancel any permitted activity with 30 days’ notice to the community-based
youth sports organization that conflicts with a DCPS activity on or at the outdoor athletic and
recreational field.
“(g) The Department may suspend or revoke the certification of a community-based youth
sports organization if:
“(1) More than 25% of the permits accepted are not used in a given sports season,
excluding postponements due to weather or unforeseen circumstances outside of the control of the
certified community-based youth sports organization;


“(2) Any permit is transferred to or used by any other entity without the written
consent of the Department;
“(3) For a DCPS school permit, any violation of specific agreements relating to
cleanup, trash disposal, and securing the field after use; or
“(4) The certified community-based youth sports organization fails to remain in
good standing with the Department or meet other requirements that may be set by the Department,
DCPS, or other District agencies.
“(h) The Department shall require a certified community-based youth sports organization
to re-apply for certification annually.”.
Sec. 4. Section 3 of the Ensuring Community Access to Recreational Spaces Act of 2018,
effective February 22, 2019 (D.C. Law 22-210; D.C. Official Code § 38-431 et seq.), is amended
100 as follows:
101 (a) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
102 “(a) School facilities shall be used according to the following order of priority:
103 “(1) Use of the school facility by the public school where the school facility is
104 located;
105 “(2) Use of the school facility by DCPS;
106 “(3) Community use at times designated by the Mayor; and
107 “(4) Use of the school facility by permit holders, including permits issued by the
108 Department of Parks and Recreation.
109 (b) Subsection (b)(2) is amended by adding a new subparagraph (B-i) to read as follows:
110 “(B-i) Certified community-based youth sports organizations;”.


111 (c) Subsection (c) is amended by striking the phrase “school facility” and inserting the
112 phrase “school facility, except that custodial or security fees shall not be charged for the use of a
113 field” in its place.
114 Sec. 5. Section 717.2 of Title 19 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations is
115 amended to read as follows:
116 “If more than one (1) applicant is seeking a permit for the same permitted use or equipment
117 at the same time, the Department shall establish the following priority:
118 “(a) Department-sponsored activities;
119 “(b) Athletic programs organized by DCPS, District public charter schools, or the
120 DCSAA for competitive league play and not for intramurals;
121 “(c) Certified community-based youth sports organizations as recognized by the
122 Department and youth non-profit organizations, including schools, principally serving District
123 residents;
124 “(d) Non-profit partners such as Programmatic Partners, Park Partners, and
125 Collaborative Partners or designated organizations recognized by the Department in a written
126 agreement;
127 “(e) Adult non-profit organizations principally serving District residents;
128 “(f) Other organizations, groups, or individuals for private use that are based in the
129 District; and then
130 “(g) Others.”.
131 Sec. 6. Fiscal impact statement.
132 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal impact
133 statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
134 October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).


135 Sec. 7. Effective date.
136 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
137 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
138 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24,
139 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
140 Columbia Register.